Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
LICENSING

§159-11 Certificate of sanitation.
(a) The board may issue certificates of sanitation to slaughterhouses and meat
processors which are subject to this chapter and which meet minimum sanitary
specifications required for:

(1) The slaughtering of animals for use of the meat
or meat products in intrastate commerce.

(2) The processing, rendering, transporting, storing,
and handling of the meat or meat products in intrastate commerce. The board
may adopt rules, subject to chapter 91, governing the minimum sanitary
specifications and prescribing forms, requiring reports, and providing for
periodic renewals of the certificates.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law or rule
under this chapter which requires the renovation or upgrading of the physical
facilities of slaughterhouses and meat processors in order to obtain a
certificate of sanitation, the board shall nonetheless issue certificates of
sanitation to slaughterhouses and meat processors licensed by the State;
provided that:

(1) The facilities of the slaughterhouses and meat
processors are sanitary and the products which emerge from their respective
operations are wholesome, not adulterated, and fit for human consumption; and

(2) Upon the sale or transfer of any of the foregoing
businesses, the person to whom the business is transferred shall be required to
meet all of the requirements and the rules under this chapter. [L 1969, c 214,
pt of §1; am L 1990, c 139, §4; am L 1991, c 88, §1; am L 1993, c 248, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next